Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.187

Flammable liquid.

"Flammable liquid" means any liquid which has a flash point of 70° Fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a Tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.210. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 22; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part. Cf. 1951 c 102 s 3. Formerly RCW 46.04.210.]